Vermont, session 2025-2026, H413.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 23 V.S.A. § 1243(b) is amended to read:
(b) Every A person operating a vehicle upon a highway within this State,
shall illuminate all front, tail or rear, and clearance lamps with which the
vehicle is required to be equipped pursuant to this chapter at any time all of the
following times:
(1) from From 30 minutes after sunset to 30 minutes before sunrise and
at any other time when.
VT LEG #380667 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.413
2025 Page 2 of 3
(2) When, due to insufficient light or unfavorable atmospheric weather
conditions, persons or vehicles on the highway are not clearly discernible at a
distance of 500 feet ahead, shall display lighted lamps and illuminating devices
as respectively required for different classes of vehicles, subject to exceptions
with respect to parked vehicles including when persons or vehicles on the
highway in front of the vehicle are not clearly discernible due to rain, snow,
fog, dust, smoke, or other particulate matter.
(3) When windshield wipers are in continuous, as opposed to
intermittent, use as a result of weather conditions. A person who violates this
subdivision shall be subject to a civil penalty of $200.00 but shall not be
subject to the assessment of points against the person’s driving record.
Sec. 2. 23 V.S.A. § 1248 is amended to read:
§ 1248. TAILLIGHTS
(a) Every motor vehicle, trailer, semi-trailer, and pole trailer, and any other
vehicle that is being drawn at the end of a combination of vehicles, shall be
equipped with at least two red taillamps mounted on the rear that emit light
that is visible at a distance of 300 feet behind the vehicle, except that one
taillamp shall be allowed on any vehicle equipped with only one when it was
manufactured. Nothing shall be towed behind a motor vehicle, or mounted or
placed on the rear of a motor vehicle, trailer, semi-trailer, pole trailer, or any
other vehicle that is being drawn at the end of a combination of vehicles, that
VT LEG #380667 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.413
2025 Page 3 of 3
prevents the light emitted by at least two red taillamps from being visible at a
distance of 300 feet behind the vehicle.
* * *
Sec. 3. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
VT LEG #380667 v.2